District of Columbia statutes.
31-1372.12

Additional investment authority.

(a)

Solely for the purpose of acquiring investments that exceed the quantitative limitations of §§ 31-1372.02 through 31-1372.09, an insurer may acquire under this subsection an investment, or engage in investment practices, described in § 31-1372.08; provided, that an insurer shall not acquire and investment, or engage in investment practices, described in § 31-1372.08 under this subsection if, as a result of and after giving effect to the transaction:

(1)

The aggregate amount of investments held by an insurer under this subsection would exceed 3% of its admitted assets; or

(2)

The aggregate amount of investments as to one limitation in §§ 31-1372.02 through 31-1372.09 held by the insurer under this subsection would exceed 1% of its admitted assets.

(b)

(1)

In addition to the authority provided under subsection (a) of this section, subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an insurer may acquire under this subsection an investment of any kind, or engage in investment practices described in § 31-1372.08, that are not specifically prohibited by this chapter without regard to the categories, conditions, standards, or other limitations of §§ 31-1372.02 through 31-1372.09 if, as a result of and after giving effect to the transaction, the aggregate amount of investments held under this subsection would not exceed the lesser of:

(A)

Ten percent of its admitted assets; or

(B)

Seventy-five percent of its capital and surplus.

(2)

An insurer shall not acquire any investment or engage in any investment practice under this subsection if, as a result of and after giving effect to the transaction, the aggregate amount of all investments in any one person held by the insurer under this subsection would exceed 3% of its admitted assets.

(c)

In addition to the investments acquired under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an insurer may acquire under this subsection an investment of any kind, or engage in investment practices described in § 31-1372.08, that are not specifically prohibited by this chapter without regard to any limitations of §§ 31-1372.02 through 31-1372.09 if:

(1)

The Commissioner grants prior approval;

(2)

The insurer demonstrates that its investments are being made in a prudent manner and that the additional amounts will be invested in a prudent manner; and

(3)

As a result of and after giving effect to the transaction, the aggregate amount of investments held by the insurer under this subsection does not exceed the greater of:

(A)

Twenty-five percent of its capital and surplus; or

(B)

One hundred percent of capital and surplus, less 10% of its admitted assets.

(d)

An investment prohibited under § 31-1371.05 or § 31-1372.10 or additional derivative instruments acquired under § 31-1372.10 shall not be acquired under this section.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 212, 50 DCR 330
This section is referenced in § 31-1371.03.